Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the sovereignty of federally recognized tribal governments and the essential role their apprenticeship programs play in the development of a skilled and trained workforce, particularly in rural and underrepresented communities. Tribal apprenticeship programs ensure tribal members have equitable access to employment and training opportunities in critical industries, including in the building and construction trades at petroleum refineries and in petrochemical manufacturing. The legislature intends for apprenticeship programs operated by federally recognized tribal governments to have the same rights and responsibilities as other approved programs that supply workers to these critical industries, so long as those programs have completed the federal approval process for apprenticeship programs.Sec. 2. RCW 49.80.010 and 2019 c 306 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Apprenticeable occupation" means an occupation for which an apprenticeship program has been approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW.(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.(3) "On-site work" does not include ship and rail car support activities; environmental inspection and testing; security guard services; work which is performed by an original equipment manufacturer for warranty, repair, or maintenance on the vendor's equipment if required by the original equipment manufacturer's warranty agreement between the original equipment manufacturer and the owner; industrial cleaning not related to construction; safety services requiring professional safety certification; nonconstruction catalyst loading, regeneration, and removal; chemical purging and cleaning; refinery by-product separation and recovery; inspection services not related to construction; and work performed that is not in an apprenticeable occupation.(4) "Prevailing hourly wage rate" has the meaning provided for "prevailing rate of wage" in RCW 39.12.010.(5) "Registered apprentice" means an apprentice registered in ((an)): (a) An apprenticeship program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to chapter 49.04 RCW; or (b) an apprenticeship program approved by the federal government and operated by a federally recognized tribal government.(6) "Skilled and trained workforce" means a workforce that meets both of the following criteria:(a) All the workers are either registered apprentices or skilled journeypersons; and(b) The workforce meets the apprenticeship graduation and approved advanced safety training requirements established in RCW 49.80.030.(7) "Skilled journeyperson" means a worker who meets all of the following criteria:(a) The worker either ((graduated)): (i) Graduated from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was ((approved)): (A) Approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to chapter 49.04 RCW((,)); or (B) approved by the federal government and was operated by a federally recognized tribal government; or (ii) has at least as many hours of on-the-job experience in the applicable occupation that would be required to graduate from an apprenticeship program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to chapter 49.04 RCW; and(b) The worker is being paid at least a rate commensurate with the wages typically paid for the occupation in the applicable geographic area, subject to the following provisions:(i) The prevailing wage rate paid for a worker in the applicable occupation and geographic area on public works projects may be used to determine the appropriate rate of pay, however, this subsection (7)(b) does not require a contractor to pay prevailing wage rates; and(ii) In no case may the worker be paid at a rate less than an hourly rate consistent with the seventy-fifth percentile in the applicable occupation and geographic area in the most recent occupational employment statistics published by the employment security department.Sec. 3. RCW 49.80.020 and 2019 c 306 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An owner or operator of a stationary source that is engaged in activities described in code 324110 or 325110 of the North American industry classification system, when contracting for the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or maintenance work at the stationary source, shall require that its contractors and any subcontractors use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all on-site work within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades. This section shall not apply to oil and gas extraction operations.(2)(a) The department in consultation with the Washington state apprenticeship and training council shall approve a curriculum of in-person classroom and laboratory instruction for approved advanced safety training for workers at high hazard facilities.(b) The safety training must be provided by a training provider((, which may include a registered apprenticeship program,)) approved by the department, which may include but is not limited to a state approved apprenticeship program or federally approved and tribal-operated apprenticeship program. The department must periodically review and revise the curriculum to reflect current best practices.(c) Upon receipt of certification from the approved training provider, the department must issue a certificate to a worker who completes the approved curriculum.(d) The department may accept a certificate or other documentation issued by another state or tribal government if the department finds that the curriculum and documentation of the other state or tribal government meets the requirements of this subsection.(3) This section applies to work performed under contracts awarded, contract extensions, and contract renewals occurring on or after January 1, 2020. This section shall also apply to work performed under a contract awarded before January 1, 2020, if the work is performed more than one year after January 1, 2020.(4) This section does not apply to:(a) The employees of the owner or operator of the stationary source, nor does it prevent the owner or operator of the stationary source from using its own employees to perform any work that has not been assigned to contractors while the employees of the contractor are present and working;(b) A contractor who has requested qualified workers from the local hiring halls or apprenticeship programs that dispatch workers in the apprenticeable occupation and who, due to workforce shortages, is unable to obtain sufficient qualified workers within forty-eight hours of the request, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excepted; and(c) Emergencies that make compliance impracticable because they require immediate action to prevent harm to public health or safety or to the environment. This section applies as soon as the emergency is over or it becomes practicable for contractors to obtain a qualified workforce.(5) The requirements under subsection (1) of this section apply to each individual contractor's and subcontractor's on-site workforce.(6) The requirements of this section do not make the work described in subsection (1) of this section a public work within the meaning of RCW 39.04.010.Sec. 4. RCW 49.80.030 and 2019 c 306 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The following implementation schedule must be complied with to meet the requirements of RCW 49.80.020 for a skilled and trained workforce to perform all on-site work within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades:(1)(((a) By January 1, 2021, at least twenty percent of the skilled journeypersons must be graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council under chapter 49.04 RCW;(b) By January 1, 2022, at least thirty-five percent of the skilled journeypersons must be graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council under chapter 49.04 RCW;(c) By January 1, 2023, at least forty-five percent of the skilled journeypersons must be graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to chapter 49.04 RCW; and(d) By January 1, 2024, at))At least sixty percent of the skilled journeypersons must be graduates of ((an))either: (a) An apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation approved by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council according to chapter 49.04 RCW; or (b) a tribal-operated apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation approved by the federal government; and(2) ((By January 1, 2022, all))All workers in the skilled and trained workforce must have completed within the past three calendar years at least twenty hours of approved advanced safety training for workers at high hazard facilities.--- END ---